Hawaii statutes.
§454F-8 Standards for license renewal. (a)
The minimum standards for license renewal for mortgage loan originators shall
include the following:

(1) The mortgage loan originator continues to meet
the minimum standards for licensure under section 454F-5;

(2) The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the
annual continuing education requirements in section 454F-9 prior to requesting
renewal; and

(3) The mortgage loan originator has paid all
required fees for renewal of the license.

(b) The minimum standards for license renewal
for mortgage loan originator companies shall include the following:

(1) The mortgage loan originator company continues to
meet the minimum standards for licensure established pursuant to section
454F-5;

(2) The mortgage loan originator company's qualified
individual and every branch manager have satisfied the minimum standards for
license renewal;

(3) The mortgage loan originator company has paid all
required fees for renewal of the license; and

(4) The mortgage loan
originator company is registered with the business registration division of the
department of commerce and consumer affairs.

(c) The license of a mortgage loan originator or
mortgage loan originator company that fails to satisfy the minimum standards
for license renewal shall expire. The commissioner may adopt procedures for
the reinstatement of expired licenses consistent with section 454F‑8.5
and the standards established by NMLS. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c
84, §15; am L 2011, c 194, §8; am L 2012, c 252, §9; am L 2013, c 168, §10; am
L 2014, c 198, §3; am L 2016, c 122, §11]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next